District of Columbia statutes.
1-610.56

Repealed

Additional income allowance.

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 1056
as added June 10, 1998, D.C. Law 12-124, § 101(m), 45 DCR 2464
May 2, 2015, D.C. Law 20-267, § 2(e), 62 DCR 1543
1981 Ed., § 1-611.56.
Applicability of § 101(m) of D.C. Law 12-124: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 1-610.51.